North Carolina, session 2025, HB997.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 11-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 11-7. Oath or affirmation to support Constitutions; all officers to take.
(a) Every member of the General Assembly and every person elected or appointed to
hold any office of trust or profit in the State shall, before taking office or entering upon the
execution of the office, take and subscribe to the following oath:
"I, ___________, do solemnly and sincerely swear that I will support the Constitution of the
United States; that I will be faithful and bear true allegiance to the State of North Carolina, and
to the constitutional powers and authorities which are or may be established for the government
thereof; and that I will endeavor to support, maintain and defend the Constitution of said State,
not inconsistent with the Constitution of the United States, to the best of my knowledge and
ability; so help me God."
(b) Prior to taking the oath of office, every member of the General Assembly shall certify
to the Principal Clerk of the house for which that member has been elected or appointed whether
or not that member has read, listened to, or otherwise reviewed a copy of the Constitutions of the
United States and the State of North Carolina within the previous two years."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective January 1, 2027.
*H997-v-1*